Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB295.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2426YC (2) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321G.32, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. If a lien has been released by the 3 lienholder, proof of such release may be presented to the 4 county recorder of any county, and the county recorder shall 5 note the release on the face of the certificate of title and 6 enter the release on the statewide computer system. 7 Sec. 2. Section 321I.34, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 8 following new subsection: 9 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. If a lien has been released by the 10 lienholder, proof of such release may be presented to the 11 county recorder of any county, and the county recorder shall 12 note the release on the face of the certificate of title and 13 enter the release on the statewide computer system. 14 Sec. 3. Section 462A.84, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 15 following new subsection: 16 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. If a lien has been released by the 17 lienholder, proof of such release may be presented to the 18 county recorder of any county, and the county recorder shall 19 note the release on the face of the certificate of title and 20 enter the release on the statewide computer system. 21